Illinois, session 104th, SB977.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Job Opportunities for Qualified Applicants 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 75/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Job 8Opportunities for Qualified Applicants Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-774, eff. 1-1-15.)